Utah statutes.
58-71-301.   Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of naturopathic medicine, on or for any person in Utah, as a naturopathic physician.

(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of naturopathic physician.

